District of Columbia statutes.
29-509

Proxy prohibited.

A shareholder of a professional corporation shall not enter into a voting trust, proxy, or any other arrangement vesting another person, other than another shareholder of the same corporation, with the authority to exercise the voting power of any or all of his shares, and any such voting trust, proxy, or other arrangement shall be void.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-410.
1981 Ed., § 29-610.
1973 Ed., § 29-1110.